Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 1. Qualifications and Requirements of All Candidates.

§ 24.2-500.
Qualification of candidates.

In order to qualify as a candidate for any office of the Commonwealth, or of its governmental units, a person must be qualified to vote for and hold that office. In order to hold any office of the Commonwealth or its governmental units, elective by the people, the candidate must have been a resident of the Commonwealth for one year next preceding his election and be qualified to vote for that office.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-132; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-167; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 226; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1984, c. 480; 1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1; 1988, c. 469; 1990, cc. 476, 865; 1991, c. 137; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to the required disclosure of certain personal and financial interests of legislators, see § 30-110.

Law Review.

For a symposium, “The Law and Economics of Elections,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1533 (1999).

§ 24.2-501.
Statement of qualification as requirement of candidacy.

It shall be a requirement of candidacy for any office of the Commonwealth, or of its governmental units, that a person must file a written statement under oath, on a form prescribed by the State Board, that he is qualified to vote for and hold the office for which he is a candidate. Every candidate for election to statewide office, the United States House of Representatives, or the General Assembly shall file the statement with the State Board. Every candidate for any other office shall file the statement with the general registrar of the county or city where he resides. Each general registrar shall transmit to the State Board, immediately after the filing deadline, a list of the candidates who have filed statements of qualification.

The candidate may state, as part of his statement of qualification, how he would like his name to appear on the ballot; however, all names printed on the ballot shall meet the criteria established by the State Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-132; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-167; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 226; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1984, c. 480; 1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1; 1988, c. 469; 1990, cc. 476, 865; 1991, c. 137; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, added the last paragraph.

§ 24.2-502.
Statement of economic interests as requirement of candidacy.

It shall be a requirement of candidacy that a written statement of economic interests shall be filed by (i) a candidate for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, or Attorney General and a candidate for the Senate or House of Delegates with the State Board, (ii) a candidate for a constitutional office with the general registrar for the county or city, and (iii) a candidate for member of the governing body or elected school board of any county, city, or town with a population in excess of 3,500 persons with the general registrar for the county or city. The statement of economic interests shall be that specified in § 30-111 for candidates for the General Assembly and in §

2.2-3117

for all other candidates. The foregoing requirement shall not apply to a candidate for reelection to the same office who has met the requirement of annually filing a statement pursuant to §

2.2-3114

,

2.2-3115

,

2.2-3116

, or 30-110.

The general registrar, the clerk of the local governing body, or the clerk of the school board, as appropriate, shall transmit to the local electoral board, immediately after the filing deadline, a list of the candidates who have filed initial or annual statements of economic interests.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-132; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-167; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 226; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1984, c. 480; 1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1; 1988, c. 469; 1990, cc. 476, 865; 1991, c. 137; 1993, c. 641; 2013, c. 542; 2014, c. 473; 2016, cc. 773, 774; 2017, cc. 829, 832.

Cross references.

As to required disclosure of personal and financial interests by certain constitutional officers, see §

2.2-3116

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 829 and 832, cl. 2 provides: “That an emergency exists and the provisions amending §§

2.2-426

and

24.2-502

of the Code of Virginia are in force from the passage of this act and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective in due course.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 542, effective July 1, 2014, deleted the section symbol from the last two sections listed at the end of the first paragraph, and substituted “Commissioner of Elections” for “Secretary of the State Board” in the last sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 473 in the second paragraph, deleted “the general registrar, and the clerk of the local governing body” following “Delegates” in the first sentence and rewrote the final sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 773 and 774 are identical, and substituted “a candidate for the Senate or House of Delegates, and” for “with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, (ii) a candidate for Senate or House of Delegates with the clerk of the appropriate house, (iii)” and “Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council and
(ii)” for “general registrar for the county or city, and (iv)” in the first paragraph; and substituted “Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council” for “Secretary of the Commonwealth and the clerks of the Senate and House of Delegates” in the second paragraph.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 829 and 832, effective April 26, 2017, are identical, and in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “with the State Board” for “and a candidate for a constitutional office with the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council and,” inserted clause (ii) and redesignated former (ii) as (iii); and inserted “2.2-3116” in the second sentence; and deleted the first sentence in the second paragraph which read “The Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council shall transmit to the State Board, immediately after the filing deadline, a list of the candidates who have filed initial or annual statements of economic interests.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Campaign fundraising. —

Section

24.2-954

precludes members of the General Assembly from engaging in fundraising activity in connection with a campaign for state office during a regular session of the General Assembly. However, that prohibition does not restrict fundraising activity related to a campaign for federal office. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert Hurt, Member, Senate of Virginia, 10-005, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 4 (1/25/10).

§ 24.2-503.
Deadlines for filing required statements; extensions.

The written statements of qualification and economic interests shall be filed by (i) primary candidates not later than the filing deadline for the primary, (ii) all other candidates for city and town offices to be filled at a May general election by 7:00 p.m. on the first Tuesday in March, (iii) candidates in special elections by the time of qualifying as a candidate, and (iv) all other candidates by 7:00 p.m. on the third Tuesday in June.

A statement shall be deemed to be timely filed if it is mailed postage prepaid to the appropriate office by registered or certified mail and if the official receipt therefor, which shall be exhibited on demand, shows mailing within the prescribed time limits.

The State Board may grant an extension of any deadline for filing either or both written statements and shall notify all candidates who have not filed their statements of the extension. Any extension shall be granted for a fixed period of time of ten days from the date of the mailing of the notice of the extension.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-132; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-167; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 226; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1984, c. 480; 1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1; 1988, c. 469; 1990, cc. 476, 865; 1991, c. 137; 1993, c. 641; 2000, c. 1045; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 239.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1045 inserted “to be filled at a May general election” in clause (ii) in the first undesignated paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 239, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “third Tuesday” for “second Tuesday” in clause (iv) of the first paragraph.

§ 24.2-503.1.
Repealed by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions, see §

24.2-948.3

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-503.1

was repealed by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892, which enacted the comparable §

24.2-948.3

.

§ 24.2-504.
Persons entitled to have name printed on ballot.

Only a person fulfilling all the requirements of a candidate shall have his name printed on the ballot for the election. No person shall have his name printed on the ballot for more than one office at any one election. However, a candidate for federal or statewide office, or a candidate for an office being filled in a special election, may have his name printed on the ballot for two offices at an election.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-132; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-167; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 226; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1984, c. 480; 1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1; 1988, c. 469; 1990, cc. 476, 865; 1991, c. 137; 1993, c. 641; 2000, cc. 513, 552; 2004, c. 881.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, cc. 513 and 552, cl. 2 provide: “That the provisions of this act shall be applicable to any election held on or after January 1, 2001.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 513 and 552, effective July 1, 2000, and applicable to any election held on or after January 1, 2001, and added the last sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 881 substituted “one office” for “two offices” in the second sentence and added the third sentence.